Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.080

Reduced cigarette ignition propensity account.

The reduced cigarette ignition propensity account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the payment of certification fees under RCW 19.305.030 and from the imposition of civil penalties under RCW 19.305.050 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for fire safety, enforcement, and prevention programs. Only the state director of fire protection or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2008 c 239 s 8.]